Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB291.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 433.900 is amended to read as follows:
As used in Sections 1 to 12 of this Act[KRS 433.900 to 433.906], unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Applicant" means a secondary metals recycler seeking an application for a license with the
commission[certificate of registration with the Department of Professional Licensing of the Public Protection
Cabinet, as provided in KRS 433.902]. If the secondary metals recycler is owned by a corporation, limited
liability company, partnership, limited partnership, incorporated association, or any other entity organized for
the purpose of engaging in business as a secondary metals recycler, "applicant" means the officers of these
entities;
(2) "Commission" means the Motor Vehicle Commission;
(3) "Ferrous metals" means any metal containing significant quantities of iron or steel;
(4)[(3)] "Name-based background check" means a statewide search of the centralized criminal history
record information system by the Department of Kentucky State Police, utilizing the name, date of birth,
and Social Security number of the applicant;
(5) "Nonferrous metals" means metal not containing significant quantities of iron, including but not limited to
copper, brass, aluminum, bronze, lead, zinc, nickel, and alloys thereof, such as any copper or bronze wire,
power inverters, bars, pipes, rods, tubing, and wire or cable or coaxial cable of the type used by public
utilities, common carriers, or telecommunication services providers;
(6)[(4) "Name-based background check" means a statewide search of the centralized criminal history record
information system by the Department of Kentucky State Police, utilizing the name, date of birth, and Social
Security number of the applicant;
(5)] "Restricted metals" means any of the following metal items:
(a) Manhole covers;
(b) Electric light poles or other utility poles;
(c) Guardrails;
(d) Street signs, traffic signs, or traffic signals;
(e) Whole road tiles;
(f) Funeral markers or funeral vases;
(g) Railroad equipment, including but not limited to a tie plate, signal house, control box, switch plate, e-
clip, or rail tie junction;
(h) Condensing or evaporating coils made from copper, aluminum, or aluminum-copper, including the
tubing or rods from a heating or air conditioning unit that is not from a window air conditioning unit or
automobile air conditioning unit;
(i) Stainless steel beer kegs;
(j) A catalytic converter or any nonferrous part of a catalytic converter unless purchased as part of a
vehicle; or
(k) Storm drain covers; and
(7)[(6)] (a) "Secondary metals recycler" means:
1. Any person who is engaged in the business of gathering or obtaining ferrous or nonferrous
metals that have served their original economic purpose or is in the business of performing the
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
manufacturing process by which ferrous metals or nonferrous metals are converted into raw
material products consisting of prepared grades and having an existing or potential monetary
value;
2. Any person who has facilities for performing the manufacturing process by which ferrous metals
or nonferrous metals are converted into raw material products consisting of prepared grades and
having an existing or potential monetary value, other than by the exclusive use of hand tools, by
methods including but not limited to processing, sorting, cutting, classifying, cleaning, baling,
wrapping, shredding, shearing, or changing the physical form or chemical content thereof; or
3. Any recycler, dealer in junk or metals, dealer in secondhand articles, vendor of bottles or rags, or
collector of or dealer in articles found in ashes, garbage, or other refuse, whether a dealer,
collector, or vendor operates an established place of business or an itinerant business.
(b) "Secondary metals recycler" shall not include a municipal solid waste department or any entity which
has been issued a municipal solid waste transporter license by the[ Kentucky] Transportation Cabinet
and which gathers or obtains ferrous or nonferrous metals in a vehicle registered in Kentucky to
transport solid waste.
SECTION 2. KRS 433.902 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
A person shall not engage or attempt to engage in business in this Commonwealth as a secondary metals recycler
unless licensed in accordance with Sections 1 to 12 of this Act.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 433 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An applicant for licensure as a secondary metals recycler shall file a written application under oath on a
form provided by the commission. An applicant who owns more than one (1) secondary metals recycling
location shall file an application for each location. Upon approval of the application and payment of the
application fee, the commission shall issue a license to the applicant.
(2) Any person listed on an application for a secondary metals recycler business license shall be at least
eighteen (18) years of age prior to the date the application is submitted.
(3) (a) Prior to approval of the application, the commission shall require a name-based background check
on each applicant.
(b) Each applicant shall provide written authorization to the Department of Kentucky State Police to
perform a name-based background check and release the results to the commission.
(c) Any request for a name-based background check shall be on a form or through a process approved
by the Department of Kentucky State Police, which may charge a fee to be paid by the applicant in an
amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request.
(d) The commission shall not issue a license to an applicant if the name-based background check results
reveal that within the last five (5) years the applicant has been convicted of, or entered a plea of
guilty, an Alford plea, or a plea of nolo contendere to, a felony involving theft, larceny, dealing in
stolen property, receiving stolen property, burglary, embezzlement, or obtaining property by false
pretenses, any felony drug offense, or intentionally violating the laws of the Commonwealth relating
to licensure as a secondary metals recycler.
(4) The application for a license shall be in a form prescribed by the commission and shall contain at a
minimum the following:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the secondary metals recycling business;
(b) The name, home address, and telephone number of each applicant;
(c) The address of each secondary metals recycling business owned by the applicant;
(d) Contact information for the purposes of Section 9 of this Act;
(e) The nature or character of the goods, wares, merchandise, or services to be offered by the applicant;
(f) Any criminal convictions within the past five (5) years related to theft, stolen property, or other
pecuniary crimes of the applicant; and

CHAPTER 182 3
(g) A statement of whether the applicant has previously been denied a license under this section or if the
applicant has had a previous license revoked or suspended, and if so, the reasons or circumstances
surrounding the denial, revocation, or suspension of the license.
(5) Each application for a license as a secondary metals recycler shall be accompanied by a reasonable fee as
established by the commission.
(6) Licenses issued by the commission shall be subject to annual renewal and shall expire unless renewed upon
payment of a reasonable renewal fee in the manner prescribed by the commission.
(7) A secondary metals recycler business license shall be conspicuously displayed at each secondary metals
recycling business owned by a secondary metals recycler.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 433 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The commission shall oversee, manage, and enforce all penalties and disciplinary actions related to
violations committed by secondary metals recyclers. The commission may coordinate with local law
enforcement agencies to ensure compliance with Sections 1 to 12 of this Act.
(2) The commission shall maintain a centralized record of violations and enforcement actions taken under
Sections 1 to 12 of this Act and shall make the records available to law enforcement agencies and
regulatory bodies as permitted by law.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 433 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A license issued by the commission may be revoked or suspended by the commission, subject to appeal
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13B, for the following reasons:
(a) Fraud, misrepresentation, or false statement contained in the license application;
(b) Fraud, misrepresentation, or false statements made while conducting business as a secondary metals
recycler;
(c) A person is a fugitive or has been convicted of a criminal offense within the preceding three (3) years
involving business or commercial fraud, extortion, or receiving stolen property;
(d) Any condition or fact that would have resulted in denial of the original license application; or
(e) Conducting business as a secondary metals recycler under this chapter in an unlawful manner or in
a manner that endangers public health, safety, or welfare.
(2) The commission shall give reasonable notice of the revocation or suspension to the secondary metals
recycler at the address listed in the application for licensure.
(3) Any secondary metals recycler whose license is revoked or suspended shall immediately surrender the
license to the commission.
(4) If a licensee is a firm or corporation, it shall be sufficient cause for the denial, suspension, or revocation of
a license that any officer, director, or trustee of the firm or corporation, or any member in case of a
partnership, has been guilty of any act or omission which would be cause for refusing, suspending, or
revoking a license to the party as an individual. Each licensee shall be responsible for the acts of any or all
of his or her employees while acting as his or her agent, if the licensee approved of or had knowledge of the
acts and after approval or knowledge retained the benefit, proceeds, profits, or advantages accruing from
the acts.
(5) Final orders of the commission as a result of any hearing may be appealed to the Franklin Circuit Court in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 433 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The commission shall monitor the LeadsOnline database, which shall serve as the centralized database for
reports by secondary metals recyclers of any metals transactions containing the information required under
Section 10 of this Act, to ensure compliance with the reporting requirements under Section 10 of this Act.
(2) Information in the LeadsOnline database shall only be provided or shared with law enforcement agencies
and regulatory bodies.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 433 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
A secondary metals recycler shall at all times maintain in a prominent place in its place of business a notice in two
(2) inch lettering that states the secondary metals recycler's usual business hours and includes the following
language:
"A PERSON ATTEMPTING TO SELL ANY REGULATED MATERIAL MUST PRESENT SUFFICIENT
IDENTIFICATION AND WRITTEN PROOF OF OWNERSHIP REQUIRED BY STATE LAW.
WARNING: STATE LAW PROVIDES A CRIMINAL PENALTY FOR A PERSON WHO PROVIDES A FALSE
IDENTIFICATION DOCUMENT OR OTHER FALSE INFORMATION TO A SECONDARY METALS
RECYCLER WHILE ATTEMPTING TO SELL ANY REGULATED MATERIAL."
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 433 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A law enforcement agency shall provide to each secondary metals recycler within the agency's jurisdiction a
searchable electronic list of persons convicted of a theft offense in which metals were involved. The list
shall be prepared in accordance with rules adopted by the law enforcement agency and shall be updated
monthly. The law enforcement agency may request the appropriate Circuit Court clerk to provide the list.
(2) The law enforcement agency shall transmit the list to the commission in an electronic format consistent
with rules adopted by the commission for inclusion in the LeadsOnline database.
(3) Before submitting the list to the LeadsOnline database, the commission shall give reasonable notice to each
person on the list and an opportunity for the person to be heard. Hearings under this subsection shall be
governed by KRS Chapter 13B. A final order of the commission may be appealed to Franklin Circuit Court
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(4) (a) A secondary metals recycler shall not purchase or receive articles from any person listed on the
electronic registry provided by the law enforcement agency.
(b) A person who has appealed his or her inclusion on the registry shall not be prohibited from selling or
giving articles to a secondary metals recycler unless a final order has been entered against the
person. The commission shall give notice to secondary metals recyclers of any person who has
initiated an appeal under subsection (3) of this section.
Section 9. KRS 433.906 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A secondary metals recycler shall maintain at its place of business, or otherwise have immediate access to, an
email[e-mail] address, facsimile, or other equipment of similar function on which notifications of stolen
restricted metals, ferrous metals, and nonferrous metals may be expeditiously received from law enforcement
officials or electronic metal theft notification systems.
(2) The equipment shall be operable at all times during the secondary metal recycler's customary business hours.
The secondary metals recycler shall notify the commission[department of Professional Licensing of the Public
Protection Cabinet] within two (2) days of any change to the contact information used for the purposes of this
section.
Section 10. KRS 433.890 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter 433, and amended to
read as follows:
(1) Every recycler, dealer in junk or metals, dealer in secondhand articles, vendor of bottles or rags, collector of or
dealer in articles found in ashes, garbage, or other refuse, whether such dealers, collectors, or vendors have
established places of business or operate a business of an itinerant nature, shall, with regard to any catalytic
converter, metal beverage container that is capable of holding more than two (2) liters of beverage and is
marketed as returnable, railroad rails, nonferrous metal or an alloy thereof, or an object containing nonferrous
metal or an alloy thereof:
(a) Enter a report into the LeadsOnline database for all metals transactions within two (2) days of the
transaction and keep a register that contains:
1. A photocopy of a valid operator's license, personal identification card, or other government-
issued identification card or document which contains the name, photograph, and signature of the
seller. If the purchaser has a copy of the seller's valid photo identification on file, it shall not be
necessary for the purchaser to make another copy of the identification document for each
purchase if the purchaser references the number on the identification document in the register at
the time of each purchase;

CHAPTER 182 5
2. The home address and telephone number of the seller, if the identification in subparagraph 1.
of this paragraph does not contain that information;
3. If a motor vehicle is[The state and license number of the motor vehicle] used to transport the
purchased catalytic converter, metal beverage container that is capable of holding more than two
(2) liters of beverage and is marketed as returnable, railroad rail, nonferrous metal or an alloy
thereof, or object containing nonferrous metal or an alloy thereof, to the place of purchase, the
color, make, model, state, and license number of the motor vehicle, which shall be provided by
the seller of the items;
4. A photograph of a motor vehicle used in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph that contains the
state and license number of the motor vehicle;
5.[3.] The time and date of the transaction;
6.[4.] A description in the usage of the trade of the kind and weight of the railroad rail, nonferrous
metal or an alloy thereof, or object containing the nonferrous metal or an alloy thereof
purchased;
7. A photograph of the property described in subparagraph 6. of this paragraph;
8.[5.] The amount paid for the material and the unit basis of the purchase, such as by ounce or pound,
etc.; and
9.[6.] For the purchase of a catalytic converter, a photocopy of:
a. The seller's identification that meets the minimum age requirement in paragraph (c) of this
subsection;
b. The receipt for the replacement catalytic converter; and
c. The title or registration for the vehicle from which the catalytic converter was removed in
the name of the seller;
(b) Not purchase any metal that has been smelted, burned, or melted unless, in addition to the other
requirements of this subsection, the seller provides the following, and the purchaser maintains a copy
thereof:
1. A signed certificate of ownership stating that he or she is the owner of the metal and is entitled to
sell it; or
2. A signed certificate from the owner of the metal stating that he or she is the owner of the metal,
and that the person selling the metal is authorized to sell the metal on behalf of the owner;
(c) Not purchase any catalytic converter, metal beverage container that is capable of holding more than two
(2) liters of beverage and is marketed as returnable, railroad rail, nonferrous metal or an alloy thereof,
or an object containing nonferrous metal or an alloy thereof from a person who:
1. Is less than eighteen (18) years of age;[ or]
2. Is unable or refuses to provide the identification and information required in paragraph (a) of this
subsection; or
3. Is attempting to conduct a retail sale outside the hours of 7:00 a.m. to 7:00 p.m.;
(d) Retain the information required by this section for a period of two (2) years, after which time, the
information may be retained, destroyed in a manner that protects the identity of the owner of the
property and the seller of the property, or transferred to a law enforcement agency specified in
paragraph (g) of this subsection;
(e) If the purchaser ceases business, transfer all records and information required by this section to a law
enforcement agency specified in paragraph (g) of this subsection;
(f) Permit any peace officer or inspector from the commission to inspect the register, and if the peace
officer or commission inspector deems it necessary to locate specific stolen property, may inspect the
catalytic converter, metal beverage and container that is capable of holding more than two (2) liters of
beverage is marketed as returnable, railroad rail, nonferrous metal or an alloy thereof, or object
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
containing nonferrous metal or an alloy thereof received during business hours with or without a
subpoena;
(g) Upon written request of the sheriff, the chief of police, or the Kentucky State Police, as appropriate,
make a report containing the information required to be retained in the register under paragraph (a) of
this subsection in person, in digital format, in writing, or by electronic means within twenty-four (24)
hours of the transaction to:
1. The sheriff of the county in which the purchase was made and the sheriff of the county in which
the business is located; and
2. When the purchase was made in a city, county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated local
government, or unified local government, to the police department of the city, county, urban-
county, charter county, consolidated local government, or unified local government in which the
purchase is made and the police department of the city, county, urban-county, charter county,
consolidated local government, or unified local government in which the business is located,
unless there is no police department in that jurisdiction;
(h) Comply with a written request pursuant to paragraph (g) of this subsection until a written notice to
cease sending the reports required by paragraph (g) of this subsection is received by the purchaser. A
request may relate to:
1. All records of purchases;
2. Records of a specific class of metals or items purchased;
3. Records of purchases during a specific period of time; or
4. Records of a specific purchase or purchases; and
(i) Retain the property in its original form or a photograph or digital image of the property for a period of
three (3) business days from the date of purchase unless notified by a peace officer having reasonable
cause to believe that the property may be stolen property, in which case, the property may be seized as
evidence by the peace officer or, if not seized, shall be retained for an additional thirty (30) days unless
earlier notified by a peace officer that the property may be sold.
(2) A sheriff or police department receiving records pursuant to this section shall retain the records for two (2)
years, after which time, it may either retain or destroy the records in a manner that protects the identity of the
owner of the property, the seller of the property, and the purchaser of the property.
(3) Any record required to be made or reported pursuant to this section may be kept and reported in hard copy or
digital or in electronic format.
(4) This section shall not apply to the purchase, sale, or transfer of:
(a) A motor vehicle, aircraft, or other item that is licensed by the state or federal government pursuant to a
legitimate transfer of title or issuance of a junk title;
(b) A firearm, part of a firearm, firearm accessory, ammunition, or ammunition component;
(c) A knife, knife parts, accessory or sheath for a knife, or knifemaking products;
(d) A nonreturnable used beverage container or food container;
(e) Jewelry, household goods containing metal, garden tools, and similar household items, except for a
catalytic converter or metal beverage container that is capable of holding more than two (2) liters of
liquid and which is marketed as returnable, which takes place at a flea market or yard sale;
(f) A single transaction involving a purchase price of ten dollars ($10) or less, but more than two (2)
transactions with the same person involving a purchase price of ten dollars ($10) or less in one (1)
seven (7) day period shall be reportable transactions;
(g) Material disposed of as trash or refuse that contains or may contain a catalytic converter, metal
beverage container that is capable of holding more than two (2) liters of beverage and is marketed as
returnable, railroad rail, nonferrous metals or an alloy thereof, or an object that contains or may contain
a railroad rail or nonferrous metals or an alloy thereof, which is collected by a municipal waste
department or by a licensed waste hauler and no payment is made to the person from whom the material
is collected by the person or agency collecting the material;

CHAPTER 182 7
(h) A catalytic converter, metal beverage container that is capable of holding more than two (2) liters of
beverage and marketed as returnable, railroad rail, nonferrous metal or alloy thereof, or an object
containing railroad rail, nonferrous metal, or an alloy thereof from a person who has maintained a
record pursuant to this section to a person who is to further recycle the metal or object containing the
metal;
(i) A catalytic converter, metal beverage container that is capable of holding more than two (2) liters of
beverage and marketed as returnable, railroad rail, nonferrous metal or an alloy thereof, or object
containing nonferrous metal or an alloy thereof under a written contract with an organization,
corporation, or association registered with the Commonwealth as a charitable, philanthropic, religious,
fraternal, civic, patriotic, social, or school sponsored organization;
(j) A purchase, pursuant to a written contract, from a manufacturing, industrial or other commercial vendor
that generates catalytic converters, metal beverage containers capable of holding more than two (2)
liters of beverage and which are marketed as returnable, railroad rail, nonferrous metal or an alloy
thereof, or object containing nonferrous metal in the ordinary course of business;
(k) An item purchased by, pawned to, or sold by a pawnbroker licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 226,
engaging in the business authorized by that chapter; or
(l) Any ferrous metal item, except for a catalytic converter, metal beverage container that is capable of
holding more than two (2) liters of beverage and is marked as returnable, or railroad rails.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 433 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
By June 1, 2027, and June 1 of each year thereafter, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committees on Judiciary and Licensing, Occupations, and
Administrative Regulations, which includes but is not limited to the following information for the preceding
calendar year:
(1) The number of:
(a) Licenses issued and to whom;
(b) On-site inspections conducted, and whether notice of the inspections was given;
(c) Violations and citations issued; and
(d) Suspended and revoked licenses; and
(2) Whether any investigations resulted in referral to law enforcement agencies, and if so, whether charges
were filed.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 433 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement
Sections 1 to 12 of this Act. Copies of the administrative regulations shall be made available on the commission's
website and in the offices of the commission.
Section 13. KRS 433.892 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of failure to maintain a register of metals and objects containing metal when the person fails
or refuses to:
(a) Obtain the information required by KRS 433.890;
(b) Enter a report into the LeadsOnline database as required by Section 10 of this Act;
(c) Keep the records required by KRS 433.890 for the period of time required in KRS 433.890;
(d)[(c)] Provide the required records to the police department or sheriff as required by KRS 433.890;
(e)[(d)] Provide access to a peace officer to records required to be kept pursuant to KRS 433.890; or
(f)[(e)] Dispose of the records required to be maintained pursuant to KRS 433.890 in a manner meeting
the requirements of KRS 433.890.
(2) Failure to maintain a register of metals and objects containing metal is a Class B misdemeanor.
Section 14. KRS 514.110 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) A person is guilty of receiving stolen property when he or she receives, retains, or disposes of movable
property of another knowing that it has been stolen, or having reason to believe that it has been stolen, unless
the property is received, retained, or disposed of with intent to restore it to the owner.
(2) The following shall be prima facie evidence that a person knew property was stolen:
(a) A person possessed recently stolen movable property; or
(b) A secondary metals recycler as defined in Section 1 of this Act intentionally failed to enter a report of
a transaction into the LeadsOnline database or maintain the information in a register pursuant to
Section 10 of this Act[possession by any person of any recently stolen movable property shall be prima
facie evidence that such person knew such property was stolen].
(3) Receiving stolen property is a Class B misdemeanor unless:
(a) The value of the property is five hundred dollars ($500) or more but less than one thousand dollars
($1,000), in which case it is a Class A misdemeanor;
(b) The value of the property is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more but less than ten thousand dollars
($10,000), in which case it is a Class D felony;
(c) A person has three (3) or more convictions under paragraph (a) of this subsection within the last five (5)
years, in which case it is a Class D felony. The five (5) year period shall be measured from the dates on
which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of conviction were entered;
(d) The value of the property is ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, in which case it is a Class C felony;
(e) The property is a firearm, regardless of the value of the firearm, in which case it is a Class D felony;
(f) The property is anhydrous ammonia, regardless of the value of the ammonia, in which case it is a Class
D felony unless it is proven that the person violated this section with the intent to manufacture
methamphetamine in violation of KRS 218A.1432, in which case it is a Class B felony for the first
offense and a Class A felony for each subsequent offense; or
(g) The offense occurs during a declared emergency as defined by KRS 39A.020 arising from a natural or
man-made disaster, within the area covered by the emergency declaration, and within the area impacted
by the disaster, in which case the person shall be charged one (1) level higher than the level otherwise
specified in this subsection.
(4) If any person commits two (2) or more separate offenses of receiving stolen property within ninety (90) days,
the offenses may be combined and treated as a single offense, and the value of the property in each offense
may be aggregated for the purpose of determining the appropriate charge.
Section 15. KRS 433.894 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful acts relating to purchase or disposition of metals when the person:
(a) Violates any provision of KRS 433.890 other than the recordkeeping provisions; or
(b) Purchases or sells copper telecommunication wire in any form or any metal property clearly
identified as belonging to a telecommunications company, unless the purchase or sale is excluded
from the requirements of Section 10 of this Act by subsection (4) of that section.
(2) Unlawful acts relating to the purchase or disposition of metals is a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 16. KRS 190.010 IS REPEALED AND REENACTED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Adapted vehicle" means a new or used motor vehicle especially designed or modified for use by an aging
or disabled person;
(2) "Automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler" means any place where five (5) or more junked, wrecked, or
nonoperative automobiles, vehicles, machines and other similar scrap or salvage materials, excluding
inoperative farm equipment, are deposited, parked, placed, or otherwise located, or any business where ten
(10) or more junked, wrecked, or nonoperative automobiles, vehicles, machines, and other similar scrap or
salvage materials are deposited, parked, placed, or otherwise located;
(3) "Automotive mobility dealer" means any motor vehicle dealer who:

CHAPTER 182 9
(a) Exclusively engages in the business of selling, offering to sell, or soliciting or advertising the sale of
adapted vehicles;
(b) Possesses adapted vehicles exclusively for the purpose of resale, either on his or her own account or
on behalf of another, as his or her primary business or incidental thereto; or
(c) Engages in the business of:
1. Selling, installing, or servicing;
2. Offering to sell, install, or service; or
3. Soliciting or advertising the sale, installation, or servicing of;
mobility equipment or other modifications specifically designed to facilitate the use or operation of a
motor vehicle by an aging or disabled person;
(4) "Business" means any person engaged as an automobile dealer, body shop operator, wrecker service
operator, service station operator, or other activity that may buy, sell, or repair nonoperative vehicles,
automobiles, or machinery as a service;
(5) "Client" means a person who has an open case file with a nonprofit organization or governmental agency
and who meets the standards for disability or disadvantaging condition as established in administrative
regulations promulgated by the commission pursuant to Section 27 of this Act;
(6) "Commission" means the Motor Vehicle Commission;
(7) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the department;
(8) "Department" means the Department of Vehicle Regulation;
(9) "Designated family member":
(a) Means the spouse, child, grandchild, parent, brother, or sister of a dealer who:
1. In the case of a deceased dealer:
a. Is entitled to inherit the dealer's ownership interest in the dealership under the terms of
the dealer's will;
b. Has otherwise been designated in writing by a deceased dealer to succeed him or her in
the motor vehicle dealership; or
c. Under the laws of intestate succession of this state is entitled to inherit the interest; or
2. In the case of an incapacitated dealer, has been appointed by a court as the legal
representative of the dealer's property; and
(b) Includes the appointed and qualified personal representative and testamentary trustee of a deceased
dealer;
(10) "Established place of business" means a permanent, enclosed commercial building located within this
state, easily accessible and open to the public at all reasonable times, and at which the business of a vehicle
dealer, including the display and repair of vehicles, may be lawfully carried on in accordance with the terms
of all applicable building codes, zoning, and other land use regulatory ordinances;
(11) "Franchise" means the agreement or contract between any new motor vehicle manufacturer, written or
otherwise, and any new motor vehicle dealer that purports to fix the legal rights and liabilities of the parties
to an agreement or contract, and pursuant to which the dealer purchases and resells the franchise product,
along with any addendums to the franchise agreement;
(12) "Fraud" means:
(a) A misrepresentation in any manner, whether intentionally false or due to gross negligence, of a
material fact;
(b) A promise or representation not made in good faith; or
(c) An intentional failure to disclose material fact;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(13) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair
dealing, as defined and interpreted in KRS 355.1-201(2)(u);
(14) "Licensor" means the commission;
(15) "Manufacturer":
(a) Means any person, partnership, firm, association, corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who
manufactures or assembles new motor vehicles, or imports for distribution through distributors of
new motor vehicles, or any partnership, firm, association, joint venture, corporation, or trust,
resident or nonresident, which is controlled by the manufacturer; and
(b) Includes the following terms, as defined:
1. "Distributor" means any person, firm, association, corporation, or trust, resident or
nonresident, who in whole or in part offers for sale, sells, or distributes any new motor vehicle
to new motor vehicle dealers, or who maintains factory representatives, or who controls any
person, firm, association, corporation, or trust, resident or nonresident, who in whole or in
part offers for sale, sells, or distributes any new motor vehicle to new motor vehicle dealers;
2. "Distributor branch" means a branch office maintained by a distributor or wholesaler
similarly to a factory branch and for the same purposes;
3. "Distributor representative" means a representative employed by a distributor, distributor
branch, or wholesaler similarly to a factory representative;
4. "Factory branch" means a branch office maintained by a manufacturer for the purpose of
selling, or offering for sale, new motor vehicles to a distributor, wholesaler, or new motor
vehicle dealer, or for directing or supervising, in whole or in part, factory or distributor
representatives, and includes any sales promotion organization, whether the same be a person,
firm, or corporation, which is engaged in promoting the sale of new motor vehicles in this
state of a particular brand or make to new motor vehicle dealers; and
5. "Factory representative" means a representative employed by a manufacturer, distributor, or
factory branch for the purpose of making or promoting for the sale of his or her, its, or their
new motor vehicles, or for supervising or contracting with his or her, its, or their dealers, or
prospective dealers;
(16) "Material recycler" means any establishment or place of business, including garbage dumps and sanitary
fills, maintained, operated, or used for storing, keeping, buying, or selling of old or scrap copper, brass,
rope, rags, batteries, paper, trash, rubber debris, waste, or motor vehicle parts, iron, steel, and other old or
scrap ferrous or nonferrous material;
(17) "Mobility equipment" means equipment specifically designed to facilitate the use or operation of a motor
vehicle by an aging or disabled person;
(18) "Moped" means a motorized bicycle with pedals whose frame design may include one (1) or more
horizontal crossbars supporting a fuel tank, or a motorized bicycle with pedals and with a step through type
frame rated no more than two (2) brake horsepower, a cylinder capacity not exceeding fifty (50) cubic
centimeters, an automatic transmission not requiring clutching or shifting by the operator after the drive
system is engaged, and the capability of a maximum speed of not more than thirty (30) miles per hour;
(19) "Motor vehicle":
(a) Means every vehicle intended primarily for use and operation on the public highways that is self-
propelled, including low-speed motor vehicles as defined in KRS 186.010; and
(b) Does not include any recreational vehicle or farm tractor or other machines and tools used in the
production, harvesting, or care of farm products;
(20) "Motor vehicle auction dealer" means any person primarily engaged in the business of offering,
negotiating, or attempting to negotiate a sale, purchase, or exchange of a motor vehicle through auction;
(21) "Motor vehicle dealer":
(a) Means any person engaged in the business of selling, offering to sell, soliciting, or advertising the
same, of new or used motor vehicles, or possessing motor vehicles for the purpose of resale, either on

CHAPTER 182 11
his or her own account, or on behalf of another, either as his or her primary business or incidental
thereto; and
(b) Does not include:
1. Receivers, trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, or other persons appointed by or
acting under the judgment or order of any court, and any bank, trust company, or lending
institution that is subject to state or federal regulation, with regard to its disposition of
repossessed motor vehicles;
2. Public officers while performing their official duties; or
3. Employees of persons enumerated in subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this paragraph, when
engaged in the specific performance of their duties as employees;
(22) "Motor vehicle leasing dealer":
(a) Means any person engaged in the business of regularly making available, offering to make available,
or arranging for another person to use a motor vehicle pursuant to a bailment, lease, or other
contractual arrangement under which a charge is made for its use at a periodic rate for at least a
monthly term, and title to the motor vehicle is in a person other than the user; and
(b) Does not mean a manufacturer or its affiliate leasing to its employees or to dealers;
(23) "Motor vehicle salesperson" means any person who is employed as a salesperson by a motor vehicle dealer
to sell motor vehicles, or who is employed as an auctioneer by a motor vehicle auction dealer to sell motor
vehicles at auction;
(24) "Motorcycle dealer" means a motor vehicle dealer who exclusively sells, offers to sell, solicits, or advertises
motorcycles, including alternative-speed motorcycles and autocycles as those terms are defined in KRS
186.010. As used in this subsection, "motorcycles" does not include mopeds;
(25) "New motor vehicle" means a vehicle that is in the possession of the manufacturer, distributor, or
wholesaler, or has been sold to the holders of a valid sales and service agreement, franchise, or contract,
granted by the manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler for the sale of the make of new vehicle, which is
new, and on which the original title has not been issued from the franchised dealer;
(26) "New motor vehicle dealer" means a vehicle dealer who holds a valid sales and service agreement,
franchise, or contract, granted by the manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler for the sale of the
manufacturer's new motor vehicles;
(27) "New motor vehicle dealership facility" means an established place of business which is being used or will
be used primarily for the purpose of selling, buying, displaying, repairing, and servicing motor vehicles;
(28) "New recreational vehicle dealer" has the same meaning as in KRS 190A.010;
(29) "Nonprofit motor vehicle dealer" means a nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that purchases motor vehicles that it may offer for purchase to
clients and other individuals who meet the definition of client and who are referred to the organization by
public or private social service agencies;
(30) "Operator" means a person, firm, or corporation operating an automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler,
or material recycler establishment or place of business, or the allowing of such automobile, vehicle, or
machinery recycler, or material recycler establishment or place of business to be placed or deposited, or to
remain on premises owned or controlled by such person, firm, or corporation;
(31) "Person" means any individual, firm, agency, company, association, partnership, business trust, trust,
estate, joint stock company, body politic, corporation, or other legal entity;
(32) "Recreational vehicle" means a vehicle that:
(a) Is primarily designed as temporary living quarters for noncommercial recreation or camping use;
(b) Has its own motive power or is towed by another vehicle;
(c) Is regulated by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration as a vehicle; and
(d) Does not require a special highway use permit;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(33) "Restricted motor vehicle dealer" means:
(a) A motor vehicle dealer who exclusively sells, offers to sell, solicits, or advertises specialized motor
vehicles, including but not limited to funeral coaches and emergency vehicles; or
(b) An automotive recycling dealer engaged in the business of dismantling, salvaging, or recycling
salvage motor vehicles for the purpose of harvesting used parts, components, assemblies, and
recyclable materials for resale, reuse, or reclamation;
(34) "Road" means any county, state, federal, or limited access highway or turnpike, including bridges and
bridge approaches;
(35) "Sale" means the issuance, transfer, agreement for transfer, exchange, lease, pledge, hypothecation,
mortgage in any form, whether by transfer in trust or otherwise, of any motor vehicle or interest in it, or of
any franchise related to it, as well as any option, subscription, other contract, or solicitation looking to a
sale, offer to attempt to sell in any form, whether spoken or written. A gift or delivery of any motor vehicle
or franchise with respect thereto, with or as a bonus on account of the sale of anything, shall be deemed a
sale of the motor vehicle or franchise; and
(36) "Used motor vehicle dealer":
(a) Means any person engaged in the business of selling at retail, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing
in used motor vehicles or autocycles as defined in KRS 186.010; and
(b) Does not mean:
1. Any person engaged in the business of dismantling, salvaging, or rebuilding motor vehicles by
means of using used parts who does not have a used motor vehicle dealer license; or
2. Any public officer performing his or her official duties.
Section 17. KRS 190.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a motor vehicle dealer, new, used, or auction
motor vehicle dealer, nonprofit motor vehicle dealer, motor vehicle leasing dealer, restricted motor
vehicle dealer, motorcycle dealer, broker, wholesaler, automotive recycling dealer, new recreational
vehicle dealer, a motor vehicle salesperson[ of motor vehicles], or a[ salesperson of] new recreational
vehicle salesperson[vehicles] shall not engage in business in this state at any location without a license
issued for that location as provided in KRS 190.010 to 190.080.
(b) An entity identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection with an established place of business may
conduct sales activities via the internet and deliver vehicles sold or leased by the licensed dealer to a
customer at the customer's residence or other suitable location, as long as the sale, lease, or delivery is
requested by the customer.
(c) If a person licensed as a motor vehicle dealer or new recreational vehicle dealer acts as a motor vehicle
salesperson or a new recreational vehicle salesperson, that person shall secure a motor vehicle
salesperson's license or a new recreational vehicle salesperson's license in addition to a license for a
motor vehicle dealer or for a new recreational vehicle dealer.
(2) A manufacturer of motor vehicles, recreational vehicles, factory branch, distributor, distributor branch, or
wholesaler shall not engage in business in this state without a license as provided in KRS 190.010 to 190.080.
(3) A factory representative or distributor representative shall not engage in business in this state without a license
as provided in KRS 190.010 to 190.080.
(4) An automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler, or material recycler shall not engage in business in this state
without a license as provided in Sections 18 to 24 of this Act.
(5) Application for license shall be made to the licensor, at a time, in a form, and containing information the
licensor shall require and shall be accompanied by the required fee. The licensor may require, as part of the
application process, information relating to the applicant's solvency, financial standing, or other pertinent
matter commensurate with the safeguarding of the public interest in the locality in which the applicant
proposes to engage in business. The information may be considered by the licensor in determining the fitness
of the applicant to engage in business as set forth in this section.
(6)[(5)] All licenses shall be granted or refused within thirty (30) days after submission of a complete
application and shall expire, unless revoked or suspended, on December 31 of the calendar year for which they

CHAPTER 182 13
are granted. If a complaint of unfair cancellation of dealer franchise is in the process of being heard, a
replacement application for the franchise shall not be considered until a decision is rendered by the
commission.
(7)[(6)] (a) The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A to establish annual license fees, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), for:
1. New motor vehicle dealers;
2. Used motor vehicle dealers;
3. Motor vehicle leasing dealers;
4. Restricted motor vehicle dealers;
5. Motorcycle dealers;
6. Motor vehicle manufacturers and factory branches;
7. Distributors, motor vehicle auction dealers, and wholesalers;
8. Factory representatives and distributor branch representatives;
9. Automotive mobility dealers;
10. Nonprofit motor vehicle dealers;
11. Recreational vehicle manufacturers and distributors;[ and]
12. New recreational vehicle dealers;
13. Automobile, vehicle, or machinery recyclers; and
14. Material recyclers.
(b) The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
establish annual license fees, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50), for motor vehicle salespersons and new
recreational vehicle salespersons.
(c) In addition to the annual license fees established under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the commission
may promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish licenses
and appropriate fees for other licensee activities.
(d) A license fee imposed on motor vehicle salespersons and new recreational vehicle salespersons shall be
paid by the licensed dealer for every salesperson the dealer employs.
(e) A license fee shall not be imposed on nonprofit motor vehicle dealer salespersons.
(8)[(7)] (a) The licenses of dealers, manufacturers, factory branches, distributors, and distributor branches
shall specify the location of the office or branch and shall be conspicuously displayed there. If the
location is changed, the licensor shall endorse the change of location on the license. A licensee shall not
be charged a fee for changing locations. A change of location shall require a new application.
(b) 1. A motor vehicle dealer who is not a new motor vehicle dealer may conduct a temporary sale or
display in the county where the dealer is licensed to conduct business.
2. A new motor vehicle dealer may conduct a temporary sale or display in the dealer's market as
defined in KRS 190.047(6).
3. A recreational vehicle dealer may conduct a temporary sale or display in the county where the
dealer is licensed to conduct business or in any other county where there is no licensed
recreational vehicle dealer.
(c) A temporary sale or display may be conducted under this subsection if the temporary sale or display is
permitted under an enabling ordinance enacted by the city, county, urban-county government, or
consolidated local government within whose boundaries the temporary sale or display is to be
conducted. A temporary sale or display shall be advertised as temporary in nature and shall consist of a
representative sampling of the inventory of each participating licensee.
(d) [The provisions of ]This subsection shall not apply to a nonprofit motor vehicle dealer.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(9)[(8)] Every salesperson, factory representative, or distributor representative shall carry his or her license
when engaged in business, and display it upon request. The license shall name his or her employer; and in
case of a change of employer, the salesperson shall immediately mail his or her license to the licensor who
shall endorse the change on the license without charge.
(10)[(9)] If the licensor has reasonable cause to doubt the financial responsibility or the compliance by the
applicant or licensee with the provisions of this statute, the licensor may require the applicant or licensee to
furnish and maintain a bond in a form, amount and with sureties up to one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000), conditioned upon the applicant or licensee complying with the provisions of the statutes applicable
to the licensee. The bonds shall be executed in the name of the State of Kentucky for the benefit of any
aggrieved parties, but the penalty of the bond shall not be invoked except after a court adjudication. The
commission may promulgate administrative regulations to permit the applicant to submit evidence, in lieu of
posting bond, that reliable financial arrangements, deposits, or commitments exist providing assurance,
substantially equivalent to that afforded by a bond complying with this subsection, for payment on conditions
and indemnity set forth in this subsection. The bonding requirements of this subsection shall not apply to
manufacturers, factory branches, and their agents.
(11)[(10)] Application for dealer's license shall be submitted to the commission and contain information the
commission may require. A motor vehicle dealer, unless licensed under KRS 190.010 to 190.080, shall not be
permitted to register, receive, or use any motor vehicle registration plates.
(12)[(11)] Every motor vehicle dealer or new recreational vehicle dealer licensed in accordance with[ the
provisions of] this section shall make reports to the licensor at intervals and show information the licensor may
require.
Section 18. KRS 177.910 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter 190, and amended to
read as follows:
A person shall not[No person shall] operate or cause to be operated any automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler,
or material recycler[recycling] establishment or place of business which is situated closer than one thousand (1,000)
feet from the right-of-way line of any road unless a license[permit] for the[such] operation has been[shall have been]
obtained from the commission[department]. The operation of any automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler, or
material recycler[recycling] establishment or place of business so situated without a license[permit] is hereby
declared to be a public nuisance.
Section 19. KRS 177.912 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter 190, and amended to
read as follows:
An automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler[recycling] establishment or place of business, or material
recycler[recycling] establishment or place of business which complies as a conforming use in an industrially zoned
area under the applicable zoning ordinances and regulations of any county or city, as determined in the discretion of
the commission[commissioner of highways], shall not be deemed to be in violation of Sections 18 to 24 of this
Act[KRS 177.905 to 177.950].
Section 20. KRS 177.915 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter 190, and amended to
read as follows:
(1) The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
establish that the license required under Section 18 of this Act shall be issued[The permit required by KRS
177.910 shall be issued in accordance with the administrative regulations of the department, promulgated
pursuant to the provisions of KRS 177.905 to 177.950,] when it is shown to the satisfaction of the
commission[commissioner] that an automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler, or material recycler[recycling]
establishment or place of business located closer than one thousand (1,000) feet from the right-of-way line of
any road is, so far as deemed practical by the commission[secretary], hidden from the view of motorists using
the[such] road by an artificial or natural screen, or is hidden by virtue of natural topography[ so hidden].
(2) The screening required in this section may be effected by the construction of a fence, or by planting shrubs,
trees, or flowering plants, the foliage of which shall, immediately upon planting, provide a sufficient screen or
by making use of foliage already in existence.
(3) Any automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler, or material recycler[recycling] establishment or place of
business that cannot as a practical matter be screened[,] shall be required to be removed.
Section 21. KRS 177.925 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter 190, and amended to
read as follows:

CHAPTER 182 15
Where the commission[commissioner] has reasonable cause to doubt the financial responsibility of the operator or
compliance by the operator with Sections 18 to 24 of this Act[the provisions of KRS 177.905 to 177.950], the
commission[commissioner] may require the[such] operator to furnish and maintain a bond in the[such] form,
amount, and with the[such] sureties as it[he] shall approve, but not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more
than five thousand dollars ($5,000) conditioned upon the operator complying with Sections 18 to 24 of this Act[the
provisions of KRS 177.905 to 177.950] and the administrative regulations adopted pursuant thereto. Any bond
forfeiture is hereby appropriated to the commission[state road fund].
Section 22. KRS 177.935 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter 190, and amended to
read as follows:
The commission[department] is hereby empowered to:
(1) Exercise general supervision of the administration and enforcement of Sections 18 to 24 of this Act;[KRS
177.905 to 177.950.]
(2) Promulgate[, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A,] administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
pertaining to the operation of automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler, or material recycler[recycling]
establishments or places of business as the commissioner may deem necessary to the administration and
enforcement of Sections 18 to 24 of this Act;[KRS 177.905 to 177.950.]
(3) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A with respect to the sufficiency,
type of material or foliage, height, density, and size of screening required by Section 20 of this Act[KRS
177.915] to ensure[insure] the accomplishment of the purposes of Sections 18 to 24 of this Act;[KRS 177.905
to 177.950.]
(4) Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A with respect to the procedural
aspects of hearings conducted in accordance with[, supplemental to] KRS Chapter 13B, the filing of reports
and orders, the issuance of licenses[permits] and other matters;[.]
(5) Issue, after hearing, final orders abating the operation of an automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler, or
material recycler[recycling] establishments or places of business in violation of the provisions of Sections 18
to 24 of this Act[KRS 177.905 to 177.950], or requiring the adoption of remedial measures including the
construction or planting of screens or the utilization of natural screening, extension, modification, or addition
to new or existing screens;[.]
(6) Issue, continue in effect, revoke, modify, or deny under conditions as the commission[department] may
prescribe and subject to a hearing in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, licenses[permits] for the operation of
an automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler, or material recycler[recycling] establishments or places of
business;[.]
(7) Make investigations or inspections which may be deemed necessary by the commission[commissioner] to
ensure[insure] compliance with Sections 18 to 24 of this Act[the provisions of KRS 177.905 to 177.950], or
with any administrative regulations or orders of the commission[department] which may be deemed necessary
to enable the commission[department] to administer and enforce the provisions of Sections 18 to 24 of this
Act;[KRS 177.905 to 177.950.]
(8) Institute in a court of competent jurisdiction procedures, including injunctive relief, to compel compliance with
Sections 18 to 24 of this Act[the provisions of KRS 177.905 to 177.950] and with the final orders and
administrative regulations issued pursuant thereto;[.]
(9) Enter at any reasonable time through any officer, assistant, agent, or employee in or upon any public or private
property for the purpose of investigation and inspection of conditions relating to the operation of any
automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler, or material recycler[recycling] establishments or places of
business; and[.]
(10) Perform any other acts as may be necessary, proper, or desirable in order to carry out effectively the duties and
responsibilities of the commission[department] prescribed in Sections 18 to 24 of this Act[KRS 177.905 to
177.950].
Section 23. KRS 177.940 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter 190, and amended to
read as follows:
(1) (a) Public hearings shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A by the
commission[department] prior to the promulgation of any administrative regulations which pertain to
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
the prevention, abatement, or control of automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler, or material
recycler[recycling] establishments or places of business.
(b) Administrative hearings shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B before:
1. The issuance of any final order prohibiting the performance by any person of any act or acts
deemed to be in contravention of any administrative regulations, orders, or licenses[permits] of
the commission[department];
2. [or before ]Denial, revocation, or modification of any license[permit] provided for by Sections
18 to 24 of this Act[KRS 177.905 to 177.950]; or
3. [before ]Any other final determination is made by the commission[department] which directly
affects the activities of any person.
(2) The commission[department] shall grant an administrative hearing to any person, not previously heard in
connection with the issuance of any order or the making of any determination, who may consider himself or
herself aggrieved by any order or determination and who shall file with the commission[department] a verified
petition alleging that the order or determination is contrary to law or that is injurious to him or her, stating the
grounds and reasons therefor and requesting a hearing[ thereon]. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13B.
Section 24. KRS 177.950 is repealed, reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter 190, and amended to
read as follows:
Any aggrieved party may appeal the final order of the commission[department] following the hearing to the Circuit
Court of the county in which the alleged offense occurred in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
Section 25. KRS 190.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, any person who violates or causes, aids, or abets any
violation of any provision of KRS 190.010 to 190.080 and KRS Chapter 190A, as such provisions apply,
respectively, to new motor vehicle dealers, new recreational vehicle dealers, manufacturers, distributors,
factory branches, or factory representatives, or any order, rule or administrative regulation lawfully issued
pursuant to authority granted by KRS 190.010 to 190.080 shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25)
nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both. Any
person who violates[ paragraphs (l), (m) or (n) of subsection (1) of] KRS 190.040(1)(l), (m), or (n) may also
be subject to a suspension or revocation sentence of not more than a year effective only in the territory
formerly served by the unfairly canceled dealer, except that in a metropolitan area serviced by several dealers
handling the same motor vehicle or recreational vehicle, the suspension or revocation order shall not be
applicable to the remaining dealers.
(2) Any person who willfully and intentionally violates any provision of KRS 190.090 to 190.140 shall be guilty
of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than[punished by a fine not exceeding] five
hundred dollars ($500).
(3) A willful violation of KRS 190.100 or 190.110 by any person shall bar his or her recovery of any finance
charge, delinquency, or collection charge on the retail installment contract involved.
(4) Any person who willfully violates KRS 190.270 to 190.320 shall be subject to a penalty of five thousand
dollars ($5,000) per violation, which may be recovered on behalf of the Commonwealth by the Attorney
General.
(5) Any person who willfully and fraudulently gives a false statement as to the total and actual consideration paid
for a motor vehicle under KRS 138.450 shall be guilty of a Class D felony and shall be fined not less than two
thousand dollars ($2,000) per offense.
(6) Any licensee who violates KRS 186A.100, 186A.105, 186A.110, or 186A.990(4) may be subject to the
following penalties levied by the commission:
(a) For the first offense, a warning or a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation;
(b) For the second offense within a two (2) year period, a fine of up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) per
violation and a suspension of the licensee's license for up to one (1) year; and
(c) For the third offense within a two (2) year period, a fine of up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) per
violation and a revocation of the licensee's license.

CHAPTER 182 17
(7) In addition to any other penalty provided in Sections 18 to 24 of this Act, any person who violates any
provision of Sections 18 to 24 of this Act or any order issued thereunder shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
and upon conviction shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000). Each day of violation shall constitute a separate offense.
Section 26. KRS 177.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 177.230 to 177.310 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
and upon arrest and conviction therefor, shall be fined[punished by a fine of] not less than five dollars ($5) nor
more than one hundred dollars ($100).
(2) Any person who willfully violates any of the provisions of KRS 177.841 to 177.890 shall, in addition to any
other penalty herein provided, be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred
dollars ($500).
(3) [In addition to any other penalty provided by KRS 177.910 to 177.950, any person violating any order or
provision of KRS 177.910 to 177.950 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished
by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). Each
day of violation of the provisions of KRS 177.910 to 177.950 shall constitute a separate offense.
(4) ]Any person who violates the weight provisions of KRS 177.9771 shall, upon conviction, be fined in an
amount equal to three cents ($0.03) per pound when the excess is three thousand (3,000) pounds or less, five
cents ($0.05) per pound when the excess exceeds three thousand (3,000) pounds but is less than four thousand
(4,000) pounds, seven cents ($0.07) per pound when the excess exceeds four thousand (4,000) pounds but is
less than five thousand (5,000) pounds, and nine cents ($0.09) per pound when the excess exceeds five
thousand (5,000) pounds. In no case shall the fine be less than sixty dollars ($60) nor more than five hundred
dollars ($500).
(4)[(5)] Any person who transports coal in violation of the weight provisions of KRS 189.221 and 189.222 and
does not have a current decal or is not transporting coal under a valid cooperative agreement within KRS
177.9771(4)(f), shall, in addition to any applicable penalty prescribed by law, be fined five hundred dollars
($500) and be required to purchase the decal described in KRS 177.9771(4).
(5)[(6)] Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 177.305 shall be fined not less than twenty dollars
($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.
Section 27. KRS 190.032 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A nonprofit organization, prior to engaging in the business of a nonprofit motor vehicle dealer, shall obtain a
nonprofit motor vehicle dealer license from the commission.
(2) A nonprofit motor vehicle dealer and persons who act as salespersons for a nonprofit motor vehicle dealer
shall be licensed and regulated by the commission under[ the provisions of] this chapter, except that a
nonprofit motor vehicle dealer shall not be required to comply with subsection (8) of Section 17 of this Act or
Section 28 of this Act[:
(a) Comply with KRS 190.030(7); or
(b) Comply with KRS 190.035].
(3) A nonprofit motor vehicle dealer may sell vehicles only to:
(a) A person who is a client of the nonprofit organization;
(b) A person referred by other nonprofit organizations or governmental agencies who meets the definition
of client[ as defined in KRS 190.010]; or
(c) A licensed motor vehicle dealer or automotive recycling dealer.
(4) The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish
requirements for initial application for and renewal of a license to be a nonprofit motor vehicle dealer and
standards for disability and disadvantaging condition. In addition, the commission may promulgate additional
administrative regulations that are necessary to implement this section.
Section 28. KRS 190.035 is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a license shall not be issued by the commission for
the purposes described in KRS 190.030(1) and to motor vehicle dealers or new recreational vehicle
dealers, either as dealer or salesperson[salesman], unless the applicant for the license has an established
place of business[ as defined in KRS 190.010] or, for recreational vehicles as defined in KRS
190A.010, and as provided by administrative regulation of the commission consistent with the activity
of the license applied for.
(b) A licensee may conduct more than one (1) business in a building otherwise meeting the requirements of
this chapter providing he or she has suitable space and adequate facilities therein to properly conduct
the business of a motor vehicle dealer.
(c) The lot requirement of this section may be waived if the dealer has sufficient space within a building to
properly show and display the motor vehicles or new recreational vehicles being sold[ by him]. The
dealer shall display a sign easily visible from the street identifying the[his] business.
(2) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to a nonprofit motor vehicle dealer.
Section 29. KRS 190.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any franchise or notwithstanding the terms or
provisions of any waiver, a manufacturer shall not cancel, terminate, or fail to renew any franchise with a
licensed new motor vehicle dealer unless the manufacturer has:
(a) Satisfied the notice requirement of subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Has good cause for cancellation, termination, or nonrenewal;
(c) Has acted in good faith[ as defined in KRS 190.010(22)]; and
(d) Has established the requirements of this subsection in proceedings before the licensor if the action is
protested by the new motor vehicle dealer within:
1. Thirty (30) days after receiving notice of the cancellation, termination, or nonrenewal; or
2. Fifteen (15) days for a termination for a cause listed in subsection (4)(c) of this section.
When a protest is filed, the licensor shall inform the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or factory
representative that a timely protest has been filed and that the manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or
factory representative shall not cancel, terminate, or fail to renew any franchise with the licensed new motor
vehicle dealer until the licensor has held a hearing and the licensor has determined that the manufacturer has
met its burden under this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any franchise or the terms or provisions of any waiver,
good cause shall exist for the purposes of a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal when:
(a) There is a failure by the new motor vehicle dealer to comply with a provision of the franchise which
provision is both reasonable and of material significance to the franchise relationship, provided that the
dealer has been notified in writing of the failure within one hundred eighty (180) days after the
manufacturer first acquired knowledge of the failure; and[.]
(b) If the failure by the new motor vehicle dealer, defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection, relates to the
performance of the new motor vehicle dealer in sales or service, then good cause shall be defined as the
failure of the new motor vehicle dealer to comply with reasonable performance criteria established by
the manufacturer, if the new motor vehicle dealer was apprised by the manufacturer in writing of a
failure, and
1. The notification stated that notice was provided of failure of performance pursuant to this
section;
2. The new motor vehicle dealer was afforded a reasonable opportunity, for a period of not less than
six (6) months, to comply with the criteria; and
3. The new motor vehicle dealer did not demonstrate substantial progress toward compliance with
the manufacturer's performance criteria during the designated period.
(3) The manufacturer shall have the burden of proof under this section.

CHAPTER 182 19
(4) Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, or conditions of any franchise prior to the termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal of any franchise, the manufacturer shall furnish notification of a termination, cancellation, or
nonrenewal to the new motor vehicle dealer as follows:
(a) In the manner described in subsection (2)(b) of this section; and
(b) In not less than ninety (90) days prior to the effective date of the termination, cancellation or
nonrenewal; or
(c) In not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the effective date of a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal
with respect to any of the following:
1. Insolvency of the new motor vehicle dealer, or filing of any petition by or against the new motor
vehicle dealer under any bankruptcy or receivership law;
2. Failure of the new motor vehicle dealer to conduct its customary sales and service operations
during its customary business hours for seven (7) consecutive business days, except for acts of
God or circumstances beyond the direct control of the new motor vehicle dealer;
3. Fraudulent misrepresentation by the new motor vehicle dealer to the manufacturer or distributor
which is material to the franchise;
4. Conviction of the new motor vehicle dealer, or any owner or operator thereof, of any felony
which is punishable by imprisonment; or
5. Revocation of any license which the new motor vehicle dealer is required to have to operate a
dealership;
(d) In not less than one hundred eighty (180) days prior to the effective date of a termination or cancellation
where the manufacturer or distributor is discontinuing the sale of the product line.
(5) Notification under this section shall be in writing by certified mail or personally delivered to the new motor
vehicle dealer; and shall contain:
(a) A statement of intent to terminate, cancel, or not to renew the franchise; and
(b) A statement of the reasons for the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal; and
(c) The date on which the termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal takes effect.
(6) Upon the termination, nonrenewal, or cancellation of any franchise, pursuant to this section, the new motor
vehicle dealer shall be allowed fair and reasonable compensation by the manufacturer for the:
(a) New current model year motor vehicle inventory which has been acquired from the manufacturer, and
which has not been damaged or altered while in the dealer's possession;
(b) Supplies and parts which have been acquired from the manufacturer;
(c) Equipment and furnishings provided the new motor vehicle dealer purchased from the manufacturer or
its approved sources; and
(d) Special tools.
Fair and reasonable compensation shall be paid by the manufacturer within ninety (90) days of the effective
date of termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal, provided the new motor vehicle dealer has clear title to the
inventory and other items and is in a position to convey that title to the manufacturer.
(7) In the event of a termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal under this section, and the new motor vehicle dealer
is leasing the dealership facilities from a lessor other than the manufacturer, or owns the dealership facilities,
the manufacturer shall pay a reasonable rent to the dealer in accordance with and subject to subsection (8) of
this section.
(8) (a) Reasonable rental value shall be paid only to the extent the dealership premises are recognized in the
franchise and only if they are:
1. Used solely for performance in accordance with the franchise; and
2. Not substantially in excess of those facilities recommended by the manufacturer.
(b) If the facilities are owned by the dealer, the manufacturer will either:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. Locate a purchaser who will offer to purchase the dealership facilities at a reasonable price; or
2. Locate a lessee who will offer to lease the premises for a reasonable term at a reasonable rent; or
3. Failing the foregoing, lease the dealership facilities at a reasonable rental value for one (1) year.
(c) If the facilities are leased by the dealer, the manufacturer will either:
1. Locate a tenant or tenants satisfactory to the lessor, who will sublet or assume the balance of the
lease; or
2. Arrange with the lessor for the cancellation of the lease without penalty to the dealer; or
3. Failing the foregoing, lease the dealership facilities at a reasonable rent for one (1) year.
(d) The manufacturer shall not be obligated to provide assistance under this section if the dealer:
1. Fails to accept a bona fide offer from a prospective purchaser, sublessee, or assignee; or
2. Refuses to execute a settlement agreement with the lessor if the agreement would be without cost
to the dealer; or
3. Fails to make a written request for assistance under this section within one (1) month of the
termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal.
(e) If, in an action for damages under this section, the manufacturer or distributor fails to prove either that
the manufacturer or distributor has acted in good faith or that there was good cause for the franchise
termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal, then the manufacturer or distributor may terminate, cancel, or
fail to renew the franchise upon payment to the new motor vehicle dealer of an amount equal to the
value of the dealership as an ongoing business location.
(9) Notice of termination to a dealer shall entitle the dealer to continue the franchise and the dealer may attempt to
sell the franchise until all of the dealer's appeal rights have been exhausted.
Section 30. KRS 190A.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following conditions shall apply to the area of sales responsibility of a new recreational vehicle dealer
included in a dealer agreement between a new recreational vehicle manufacturer and a dealer:
(a) A manufacturer or distributor shall not sell a recreational vehicle in this state to or through a dealer
without first having entered into a written dealer agreement with a dealer which has been signed by both
parties;
(b) The new recreational vehicle manufacturer shall designate in the dealer agreement the area of sales
responsibility in which the dealer has the exclusive right to display or sell the manufacturer's new
recreational vehicles of a line-make included in the dealer agreement;
(c) The manufacturer shall not contract with another dealer for the sale of the same line-make included in
the designated area for the duration of the agreement; and
(d) The area of sales responsibility shall not be reviewed or changed without the consent of both parties
until one (1) year after the execution of the dealer agreement.
(2) A new recreational vehicle dealer shall not conduct sales activity or display for sale recreational vehicles
outside of its designated area of sales responsibility except as provided in KRS 190.030(8)[(7)] and the laws of
this state.
Section 31. KRS 177.978 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All revenues generated from the purchase of decals pursuant to KRS 177.990(4)[(5)] and KRS 177.9771(4)
and no other taxes or fees normally assessed on motor carriers shall be credited to a special account within the
road fund called the "energy recovery road fund" and any additional funds obtained through state
appropriation, gifts, grants and federal funds may be credited to the special account, and shall be used, in
addition to those road funds normally used for said highways, exclusively by the Transportation Cabinet for
those costs attendant to highway purposes for roads designated as part of the extended weight coal haul road
system. All funds in the account shall be carried forward at the end of each year.
(2) All funds credited to the "coal recovery road fund" shall be transferred to the "energy recovery road fund."
Section 32. KRS 65.8840 is amended to read as follows:

CHAPTER 182 21
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Abatement costs" means a local government's necessary and reasonable costs for and associated with
clearing, preventing unauthorized entry to, or demolishing all or a portion of a structure or premises, or
taking any other action with regard to a structure or premises necessary to remedy a violation and to
maintain and preserve public health, safety, and welfare in accordance with any local government
ordinance;
(b) "Automobile collector" means a person who collects and restores motor vehicles;
(c) "Code enforcement board" means an administrative body created and acting under the authority of KRS
65.8801 to 65.8839;
(d) "Code enforcement officer" means a city police officer, safety officer, citation officer, county police
officer, sheriff, deputy sheriff, university police officer, airport police officer, or other public law
enforcement officer with the authority to issue a citation;
(e) "Imminent danger" means a condition which is likely to cause serious or life-threatening injury or death
at any time;
(f) "Local government" means any county, consolidated local government, urban-county government,
charter county government, unified local government, or city of any class;
(g) "Ordinance" means an official action of a local government body, which is a regulation of a general and
permanent nature and enforceable as a local law and shall include any provision of a code of ordinances
adopted by a local government which embodies all or part of an ordinance;
(h) "Ordinary public view" means a sight line within normal visual range by a person on a public street or
sidewalk adjacent to real property;
(i) "Owner" means a person, association, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity having a legal or
equitable title in real property;
(j) "Parts car" means an automobile that is not intended to be operated along streets and roads, but is used
to provide parts for the restoration of other automobiles; and
(k) "Premises" means a lot, plot, or parcel of land, including any structures upon it.
(2) (a) [The provisions of ]This section may be enforced through a code enforcement board pursuant to KRS
65.8801 to 65.8839, or by any other means authorized by law, including but not limited to direct
enforcement through the enactment of an ordinance as provided in subsection (7) of this section.
(b) If[ the provisions of] this section is[are] enforced through a code enforcement board pursuant to KRS
65.8801 to 65.8839, [the provisions of ]subsections (8), (9), and (10) of this section shall not apply, and
KRS 65.8801 to 65.8839 shall supersede any conflicting provisions of this section.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, it shall be unlawful for the owner, occupant, or person
having control or management of any premises within a local government to permit a public nuisance, health
hazard, or source of filth to develop thereon through the accumulation of:
(a) Junked or wrecked automobiles, vehicles, machines, or other similar scrap or salvage materials,
excluding inoperative farm equipment;
(b) One (1) or more mobile or manufactured homes as defined in KRS 227.550 that are junked, wrecked, or
inoperative and which are not inhabited;
(c) Rubbish; or
(d) The excessive growth of weeds or grass.
(4) [The provisions of ]Subsection (3)(a) of this section shall not apply to:
(a) Junked, wrecked, or inoperative automobiles, vehicles, machines, or other similar scrap or salvage
materials located on the business premises of a:
1. Licensed automotive recycling dealer as described in KRS 190.010(33)[(8)];
2. Used motor vehicle dealer as defined in KRS 190.010(36)[(6)]: or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

22 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. Motor vehicle auction dealer as defined in KRS 190.010(20)[(11)];
(b) Junked, wrecked, or inoperative motor vehicles, including parts cars, stored on private premises by
automobile collectors, whether as a hobby or a profession, if these motor vehicles and parts cars are
stored out of ordinary public view by means of suitable fencing, trees, shrubbery, or other means; and
(c) Any motor vehicle as defined in KRS 281.010 that is owned, controlled, operated, managed, or leased
by a motor carrier.
(5) An owner shall not permit any structure upon his or her premises to become unfit and unsafe for human
habitation, occupancy, or use or to permit conditions to exist on the structure or premises which are dangerous
or injurious to the health or safety of the occupants of the structure, the occupants of neighboring structures, or
other residents of the local government.
(6) A local government may provide by ordinance for the abatement and decontamination of a property where a
methamphetamine contamination notice has been posted as provided in KRS 224.1-410. Pursuant to
subsections (7) and (8) of this section, notice and an opportunity to request a hearing shall be afforded to an
owner prior to decontamination of the property. A lien for all fees, charges, and costs incurred by the local
government in the enforcement of an ordinance related to decontaminating a property where a
methamphetamine contamination notice has been posted pursuant to KRS 224.1-410 shall be placed on the
property pursuant to subsection (9) of this section. Notwithstanding subsections (12) and (13) of this section,
the costs of abatement and decontamination of a property where a methamphetamine contamination notice has
been posted are recoverable throughout the county.
(7) Any local government may establish by ordinance reasonable standards and procedures for the enforcement of
this section. The procedures shall comply with all applicable statutes, administrative regulations, or codes. Any
ordinance establishing these procedures may be enforced by any means authorized by law. Proper notice shall
be given to owners before any action is taken pursuant to this section, and, prior to the decontamination of a
property where a methamphetamine contamination notice has been posted pursuant to KRS 224.1-410 or the
demolition of any unfit or unsafe structure, the opportunity to request a hearing shall be afforded the owner.
(8) Unless imminent danger exists on the subject premises that necessitates immediate action, the local
government shall send, within fourteen (14) days of a final determination after hearing or waiver of hearing by
the owner, a copy of the determination to any lien holder of record of the subject premises by first-class mail
with proof of mailing. The lien holder of record may, within forty-five (45) days from receipt of that notice,
correct the violations cited or elect to pay all civil fines assessed for the violation and all charges and fees
incurred by the local government in connection with the enforcement of the ordinance, including abatement
costs, as permitted by subsection (9) of this section.
(9) A local government shall have a lien against the property for all civil fines assessed for the violation and for all
charges and fees incurred by the local government in connection with the enforcement of the ordinance,
including abatement costs. The affidavit of the code enforcement officer shall constitute prima facie evidence
of the amount of the lien and the regularity of the proceedings pursuant to this section, and shall be recorded in
the office of the county clerk. The lien shall be notice to all persons from the time of its recording and shall
bear interest thereafter until paid. The lien created shall take precedence over all other liens, except state,
county, school board, and city taxes, except as provided in subsection (10) of this section. The local
government shall possess the lien for ten (10) years following the date of the final, nonappealable order of a
code enforcement board or final judgment of the court. The lien may be enforced by judicial proceeding.
(10) The lien provided in subsection (9) of this section shall not take precedence or priority over a previously
recorded lien if:
(a) The local government failed to provide the lien holder a copy of the determination in accordance with
subsection (8) of this section; or
(b) The lien holder received a copy of the determination as required by subsection (8) of this section, and
the lien holder corrected the violations or paid all civil fines assessed for the violation and all charges
and fees incurred by the local government in connection with the enforcement of the ordinance,
including abatement costs.
(11) In addition to the remedy prescribed in subsection (7) of this section or any other remedy authorized by law,
the owner of a premises upon which a lien has been attached pursuant to this section shall be personally liable
for the amount of the lien, including all civil fines assessed for the violation and all charges, fees, and
abatement costs incurred by the local government in connection with the enforcement of the ordinance. The

CHAPTER 182 23
local government may bring a civil action against the owner and shall have the same remedies as provided for
the recovery of a debt owed. The failure of a local government to comply with subsection (8) of this section,
and the failure of a lien to take precedence over previously filed liens as provided in subsection (10) of this
section, shall not limit or restrict any remedies that the local government has against the owner of the premises.
(12) [The provisions of ]Subsections (7), (9), and (11) of this section shall not apply to an owner, occupant, or
person having control or management of any land located in an unincorporated area if the owner, occupant, or
person is not the generator of the rubbish or is not dumping or knowingly allowing the dumping of the rubbish
and has made reasonable efforts to prevent the dumping of rubbish by other persons onto the premises.
(13) [The provisions of ]This section shall not be enforced by a county government upon any premises situated in
an unincorporated portion of the county that is assessed as agricultural land for tax purposes by the property
valuation administrator.
(14) The right to request a hearing pursuant to this section shall be limited to a period of thirty (30) days after
notice has been placed on the property and has been sent by certified mail return receipt requested.
Section 33. KRS 15.232 is amended to read as follows:
The Attorney General shall have concurrent jurisdiction with Commonwealth's attorneys and county attorneys in the
investigation and prosecution of offenses under KRS 433.892[433.890] to 433.896, Sections 1 to 12 of this
Act[433.900 to 433.906], and 512.090.
Section 34. KRS 16.066 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall design the electronic and paper forms utilized in
subsection[KRS 433.890] (1) of Section 10 of this Act and any other forms and instructions necessary to
implement Section 10 of this Act[KRS 433.890].
(2) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall make the forms and instructions utilized in subsection (1) of
this section available on the department's internet website[Web site] for downloading by any person.
(3) The Department of Kentucky State Police shall make single copies of the forms and instructions utilized in
subsection (1) of this section available as public records, at the same rate charged for other public records. The
department shall not be required to make multiple copies of the forms or instructions for any person, but may
do so at the same rate charged for other public records.
(4) Any person may make copies of the forms and instructions required by subsection (1) of this section and may
charge for the copies. No person, other than the Commonwealth, shall apply for a copyright on the forms or
instructions provided by the Department of Kentucky State Police. The Department of Kentucky State Police
may, in the name of the Commonwealth, apply for a copyright on the forms and instructions which it produces
pursuant to this section.
(5) A purchaser required to generate, maintain, and transmit records pursuant to Section 10 of this Act[KRS
433.890]:
(a) 1. May utilize the forms designed by the Department of Kentucky State Police; or
2. May generate his or her own forms which shall contain at least the information required by
Section 10 of this Act[KRS 433.890] and which may contain additional information required by
a local government or by the purchaser; or
(b) Shall use a form specified by a local government which has adopted an ordinance in accordance with
KRS 65.871 provided the form contains at least the information required by Section 10 of this Act[KRS
433.890] and which may contain additional information required by the local government.
Section 35. KRS 65.871 is amended to read as follows:
A city, county, urban-county, charter county, unified county, or consolidated local government may adopt an
ordinance relating to the purchase of metals and metal-containing products provided the ordinance:
(1) Contains at least the provisions specified in KRS 15.232, 16.066, 433.892[433.890] to 433.896, Sections 1 to
12 of this Act[433.900 to 433.906], and 512.090, but which may contain additional provisions; and
(2) Does not specify a lesser penalty for a similar offense than specified in KRS 15.232, 16.066, 433.892[433.890]
to 433.896, and 512.090 or provides that the penalty specified in KRS 433.892[433.890] to 433.896 and
512.090 shall apply.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

24 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 36. The following KRS sections are repealed:
177.905 Definitions for KRS 177.910 to 177.950.
177.920 Permit fee -- Renewal -- Proceeds.
Section 37. To allow time to obtain licenses under this Act and notwithstanding Sections 2, 3, 17, and 18
of this Act or any other provision of this Act that may be construed to require a license to engage in business in this
Commonwealth, a secondary metals recycler that has a certificate of registration issued by the Department of
Professional Licensing of the Public Protection Cabinet or an automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler, or material
recycler that has a permit from the Department of Highways may continue to engage in business in this
Commonwealth for a period not to exceed 90 days following the effective date of this Act.
Section 38. A secondary metals recycler shall surrender to the Department of Professional Licensing of the
Public Protection Cabinet a certificate of registration issued by the department within 30 days of receipt of a license
from the Motor Vehicle Commission. If the application for a license is denied, the secondary metals recycler shall
immediately surrender the certificate of registration to the department.
Section 39. An automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler, or material recycler shall surrender to the
Department of Highways a permit issued by the department within 30 days of receipt of a license from the Motor
Vehicle Commission. If the application for a license is denied, the automobile, vehicle, or machinery recycler, or
material recycler shall immediately surrender the permit to the department.
Section 40. Whereas the Commonwealth has a duty to ensure the proper licensure of regulated industries,
an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Veto Overridden April 14, 2026.